Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB164.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Final Disposition of Fetal Remains Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Fetal death." The expulsion or extraction from its mother of a product of conception which shows no evidence of life after the expulsion or extraction."Fetal remains." The fetus expelled or extracted in the case of a fetal death.1234567891011121314151617 "Health care facility." A facility licensed under Chapter 8 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Person in charge of interment." A person who places or causes to be placed fetal remains in a grave, vault or other receptacle or otherwise disposes the fetal remains."Unborn child." An individual organism of the species homo sapiens from fertilization until expulsion or extraction from its mother.Section 3. Requirements for the final disposition of fetal remains.(a) Costs.--Upon the fetal death of an unborn child, if a parent of the unborn child selects a location for the final disposition of the fetal remains other than a location that is usual and customary for a health care facility, the parent shall be responsible for the costs relating to the final disposition of the fetal remains.(b) Duties of health care facilities.--Except as provided under subsection (a), a health care facility that possesses fetal remains shall have the following duties:(1) Provide for the final disposition of the fetal remains in accordance with the burial and transit permit requirements under 28 Pa. Code Ch. 1 (relating to administration of vital records).(2) Cremate or inter the fetal remains.(c) Identification requirements.--(1) Upon the fetal death of an unborn child, a person in charge of interment shall not be required to designate a name for the unborn child on the burial or transit permit under 28 Pa. Code Ch. 1, and the space for the name on the burial or 20250HB0164PN0122 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transit permit may remain blank.(2) In accordance with Article VIII of the act of June 29, 1953 (P.L.304, No.66), known as the Vital Statistics Law of 1953, information relating to the fetal death of an unborn child that may identify a parent of the unborn child shall remain confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure.(d) Simultaneous cremation.--If the fetal remains of an unborn child are not claimed by a parent of the unborn child, a person in charge of interment may cremate the fetal remains by simultaneous cremation.(e) Certificate of birth.--Upon the fetal death of an unborn child, the department shall not be required to issue a certificate of birth resulting in stillbirth under section 207 of the Vital Statistics Law of 1953 to a parent of the unborn child.Section 4. Penalties.A person who violates the provisions of this act shall be subject to the penalties imposed under Article IX of the act of June 29, 1953 (P.L.304, No.66), known as the Vital Statistics Law of 1953.Section 5. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to amend the definition of "fetal death" in section 105(4) of the act of June 29, 1953 (P.L.304, No.66), known as the Vital Statistics Law of 1953, to require the issuance of a death certificate for an unborn child or to require the cremation or interment of fetal remains unless affirmatively requested by the parent or next of kin of the unborn child.Section 6. Effective date.20250HB0164PN0122 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0164PN0122 - 4 - 1